California statutes. Vehicle Code
Any vehicle used by any police department, sheriff’s office, or other governmental agency for the purpose of enforcing parking laws contained in the Vehicle Code or in a local ordinance or regulation may display flashing or revolving amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle when actually engaged in the enforcement of such laws and when either necessarily stopped on a street, or when moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

25278.

Any vehicle owned or operated by a land surveyor or civil engineer licensed to practice in this state may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear, if the vehicle is engaged in any phase of a project that requires surveying or surveying related activities to be performed on a highway, or in the vicinity of a highway, and the vehicle is parked on the highway or moving at a speed lower than the normal flow of traffic. The use of, or absence of, amber warning lights as authorized in this section shall not serve as the basis for any
 civil action, a defense to a civil action, or establish negligence as a matter of law or negligence per se for comparative fault purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25279.

(a) Vehicles owned and operated by private security agencies and utilized exclusively on privately owned and maintained roads to which this code is made applicable by local ordinance or resolution, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear, while being operated in response to emergency calls for the immediate preservation of life or property.

(b) (1) Vehicles owned by a private security agency and operated by personnel who
 are registered with the Department of Consumer Affairs under Article 3 (commencing with Section 7582) of Chapter 11.5 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code may be equipped with a flashing amber warning light system while the vehicle is operated on a highway, if the vehicle is in compliance with Section 27605 and is distinctively marked with the words “PRIVATE SECURITY” or “SECURITY PATROL” on the rear and both sides of the vehicle in a size that is legible from a distance of not less than 50 feet.

(2) The flashing amber warning light system authorized under paragraph (1) shall not be activated while the vehicle is on the highway, unless otherwise directed by a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(c) A peace officer may order that the flashing amber warning light system of a vehicle that is
 found to be in violation of this section be immediately removed at the place of business of the vehicle’s owner or a garage.

(d) A flashing amber warning light system shall not be installed on a vehicle that has been found to be in violation of this section, unless written authorization is obtained from the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 76.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25280.

Vehicles operated by a local public entity, or pursuant to a permit, license, contract, or franchise with a local public entity, and used to collect and transport garbage, rubbish, or refuse may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear while stopped upon a street and actually engaged in the collection of garbage, rubbish, or refuse, or while moving between stops at a speed not greater than 10 miles per hour.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25281.

A privately owned or operated water tender vehicle, when used exclusively for contract emergency services provided to any public agency, may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle when necessarily parked on a highway or other public road, blocking or partially blocking a highway or other public road, traveling at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic, or crossing or entering a highway or other public road. The flashing amber lights shall not be displayed when the water tender vehicle is traveling to or from an
 emergency at the normal speed and flow of traffic, except when the vehicle is traveling in escort with a fire engine or other authorized emergency vehicle. The lights shall be covered with an opaque material when not being displayed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 207, Sec. 4.   Effective July 18, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

25282.

Any vehicle owned or operated by a contractor or a construction company licensed to operate in this state pursuant to the Business and Professions Code may display flashing amber warning lights to the front, sides, or rear, if the vehicle is engaged in any phase of a construction project performed on a highway, or in the vicinity of a highway, and the vehicle is parked on the highway or moving at a speed lower than the normal flow of traffic. The use of, or absence of, amber warning lights as authorized in this section shall not serve as the basis for any civil
 action, a defense to civil action, or establish negligence as a matter of law or negligence per se for comparative fault purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   Effective February 9, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Warning Lights and Devices [25300. - 25305.]

25300.

(a) Every vehicle which, if operated during darkness, would be subject to the requirements of Section 25100, and every truck tractor, irrespective of width, shall at all times be equipped with at least three red emergency reflectors. The reflectors need be carried by only one vehicle in a combination.

All reflectors shall be maintained in good working condition.

(b) When the vehicle is disabled on the roadway during darkness, reflectors of the type specified in subdivision (a) shall be immediately placed as follows:

(1) One at the traffic side of the disabled vehicle, not more
 than 10 feet to the front or rear of the vehicle.

(2) One at a distance of approximately 100 feet to the rear of the disabled vehicle in the center of the traffic lane occupied by the vehicle.

(3) One at a distance of approximately 100 feet to the front of the disabled vehicle in the center of the traffic lane occupied by such vehicle.

(4) If disablement of the vehicle occurs within 500 feet of a curve, crest of a hill, or other obstruction to view, the driver shall so place the reflectors in that direction as to afford ample warning to other users of the highway, but in no case less than 100 nor more than 500 feet from the disabled vehicle.

(5) If disablement of the vehicle occurs upon any roadway of a divided or one-way highway, the driver shall place
 one reflector at a distance of approximately 200 feet and one reflector at a distance of approximately 100 feet to the rear of the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the stopped vehicle, and one reflector at the traffic side of the vehicle not more than 10 feet to the rear of the vehicle.

(c) When the vehicle is disabled or parked off the roadway but within 10 feet thereof during darkness, warning reflectors of the type specified in subdivision (a) shall be immediately placed by the driver as follows: one at a distance of approximately 200 feet and one at a distance of approximately 100 feet to the rear of the vehicle, and one at the traffic side of the vehicle not more than 10 feet to the rear of the vehicle. The reflectors shall, if possible, be placed between the edge of the roadway and the vehicle, but in no event less than two feet to the left of the widest portion of the vehicle or load thereon.

(d) (1) Until the reflectors required by this section can be placed properly, the requirements of this section may be complied with temporarily either by placing lighted red fusees or liquid-burning flares in the required locations or by using turn signal lamps, but only if front turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously and rear turn signal lamps at each side are being flashed simultaneously.

(2) The driver of a commercial motor vehicle equipped with fusees or liquid-burning flares shall place a lighted fusee or liquid-burning flare at each of the locations specified in subdivision (b). There shall be at least one lighted fusee or liquid-burning flare at each of the prescribed locations for as long as the commercial motor vehicle is stopped. Before the stopped commercial vehicle is moved, the driver shall properly extinguish and remove
 each fusee or liquid-burning flare.

(3) If gasoline or any other flammable or combustible liquid or gas seeps or leaks from a fuel container or commercial motor vehicle stopped upon a highway, an emergency warning signal producing a flame shall not be lighted or placed except at a distance from the liquid or gas as will assure the prevention of a fire or explosion.

(4) (A) A driver shall not use or permit the use of any flame-producing emergency signal for protecting any of the following:

(i) A commercial vehicle transporting Division 1.1, Division 1.2, or Division 1.3 explosives, as classified by the United States Department of Transportation.

(ii) A cargo tank motor vehicle, whether loaded or empty, used for the transportation of
 any Class 3 flammable liquid or Division 2.1 flammable gas, as classified by the United States Department of Transportation.

(iii) A commercial motor vehicle using compressed gas as a motor fuel.

(B) In lieu of a flame-producing emergency signal, emergency reflective triangles, red electric lanterns, or red emergency reflectors shall be used, the placement of which shall be in the same manner as prescribed in Section 392.22(b) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) The reflectors shall be displayed continuously during darkness while the vehicle remains disabled upon the roadway or parked or disabled within 10 feet thereof.

(f) Subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) do not apply to a vehicle under either of the following circumstances:

(1) Parked in a legal position within the corporate limits of any city.

(2) Parked in a legal position upon a roadway bounded by adjacent curbs.

(g) In addition to the reflectors specified in subdivision (a), an emergency warning sign or banner may be attached to a vehicle which is disabled upon the roadway or which is parked or disabled within 10 feet of a roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 19.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25301.

When utility or public utility vehicles are parked, stopped or standing at the site of work as described in Section 22512, warning devices shall be displayed as follows:

(a) During daylight warning devices shall consist of either:

A warning flag or barricade striping on the front and rear of the vehicle.

A warning flag, sign, or barrier on the highway not more than 50 feet in advance of the vehicle and not more than 50 feet to the rear thereof, except that in zones where the speed limit is in excess of 25 miles per hour the
 50-foot distance may be increased up to 500 feet from the vehicle as circumstances may warrant.

(b) During darkness the warning devices shall consist of either:

One or more flashing amber warning lights on the vehicle giving warning to approaching traffic from each direction.

A warning light, flare, fusee, or reflector on the highway not more than 50 feet in advance of the vehicle and not more than 50 feet to the rear thereof, except that in zones where the speed limit is in excess of 25 miles per hour the 50-foot distance may be increased up to 500 feet from the vehicle where circumstances may warrant.

(c) The provisions of subdivision (a) or (b) do not prevent the display of both types of the warning devices during daylight or darkness.

(d) During either daylight or darkness, no warning device is necessary if the vehicle is equipped with the flashing warning lights visible to approaching traffic from each direction as provided in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.

(a) No person shall place, deposit, or display upon or adjacent to any highway any lighted fusee, except as a warning to approaching vehicular traffic or railroad trains, or both, of an existing hazard upon or adjacent to the highway or highway-railroad crossing.

(b) It is unlawful to use any fusee which produces other than a red light. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any railroad, as defined in Section 229 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) No person shall attach or permit any person to attach a lighted fusee to any part of a vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 51.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Commercial and Common Carrier Vehicles [25350. - 25353.]

25350.

Any passenger common carrier motor vehicle manufactured prior to January 1, 1968, may be equipped with green identification lamps. Any bus may be equipped with an illuminated termini sign, an illuminated identification sign, or any combination thereof, which shall not project any glaring light. Internally illuminated termini signs, identification signs, or any combination thereof, meeting the requirements of Section 25400 may be mounted inside a bus. Any commercial vehicle, other than a passenger common carrier motor vehicle, may be equipped with an illuminated identification sign upon the front thereof which shall not exceed 24 inches in length or 8
 inches in width and which emits diffused white light without glare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 813, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

25351.

(a) A commercial vehicle and any other vehicle 80 or more inches in width may be equipped with identification lamps mounted on the front or rear.

(b) Identification lamps on vehicles
 described in subdivision (a) manufactured prior to January 1, 1968, may exhibit either amber, green, or white light to the front and red light to the rear.

(c) Identification lamps on vehicles described in subdivision (a) manufactured on or after January 1, 1968, may exhibit only amber light to the front and red light to the rear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 6.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25352.

Any bus operated by a publicly owned transit system on regularly scheduled service may be equipped with a device capable of sending a signal that interrupts or changes the sequence patterns of an official traffic control signal, under the following conditions:

(a) If such a device is a flashing gaseous discharge lamp, such lamp shall not emit a visible light exceeding an average of 0.0003 candela per flash of any color measured at a distance of 10 feet.

(b) Such device shall not be installed or used
 unless and until authorized on specific routes by either the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 21350 or local authorities pursuant to Section 21351.

(c) Any bus or system operating under the conditions specified herein shall allow emergency vehicles operating pursuant to Section 25258 or 21055 to have priority in changing the sequence patterns of an official traffic control signal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 399, Sec. 6.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25353.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 25400 and 25950, a bus operated by a publicly owned transit system on regularly scheduled service may be equipped with illuminated signs that include destination signs, route-number signs, run-number signs, public service announcement signs, or a combination thereof, visible from any direction of the vehicle, that emit any light color, other than the color red emitted from forward-facing signs, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) Each
 illuminated sign shall emit diffused nonglaring light.

(2) Each illuminated sign shall be limited in size to a display area of not greater than 720 square inches.

(3) Each illuminated sign shall not resemble nor be installed in a position that interferes with the visibility or effectiveness of a required lamp, reflector, or other device upon the vehicle.

(4) Each illuminated sign shall display information directly related to public transit service, including, but not limited to, route number, destination description, run number, and public service announcements.

(5) The mixing of individually colored light emitting diode elements, including red, is allowed as long as the emitted color formed by the combination of light emitting diode elements is not
 red.

(b) (1) An illuminated sign may be operated as a dynamic message sign in a paging or streaming mode.

(2) The following definitions shall govern the construction of paragraph (1):

(A) “Paging,” meaning character elements or other information presented for a period of time and then disappearing all at once before the same or new elements are presented, is permitted if the display time of each message is between 2.7 and 10 seconds. Blanking times between each message shall be between 0.5 and 25 seconds.

(B) “Streaming,” meaning character elements or other information moving smoothly and continuously across the display, is permitted if the character movement time, from one end of the display to the other, is at least 2.7 seconds,
 and the movement time of the entire message does not exceed 10 seconds.

(c) A regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall comply with applicable federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Diffused Lights [25400. - 25401.]

25400.

(a) Any vehicle may be equipped with a lamp or device on the exterior of the vehicle that emits a diffused nonglaring light of not more than 0.05 candela per square inch of area.

(b) Any diffused nonglaring light shall not display red to the front, but may display other colors. A diffused nonglaring light shall not resemble nor be installed within 12 inches or in such position as to interfere with the visibility or effectiveness of any required lamp, reflector, or other device upon the vehicle.

(c) A diffused nonglaring
 lamp or device, other than a display sign authorized by subdivision (d), shall be limited in size to an area of 720 square inches and where any lease, rental, or donation is involved the installation of the lamp or device shall be limited to those vehicles operated either primarily within business or residential districts or municipalities, or between business districts, residential districts, and municipalities in close proximity.

(d) An internally illuminated sign emitting not more than 0.25 candela per square inch and possessing copy which does not contain a white background may be displayed on each side, but not on the front or rear, of a trolley coach or of a bus being operated in urban or suburban service as described in Section 35107 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.

No diffused nonglaring light on a vehicle shall resemble any official traffic control device.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Acetylene Lamps [25450. - 25452.]

25450.

Any motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, equipped with lighted acetylene headlamps complies with the provisions of this code concerning lighted headlamps when it has two lighted acetylene headlamps of approximately equal candlepower mounted upon the front of the motor vehicle and fitted with clear plane glass fronts and bright six-inch spherical mirrors and standard acetylene five-eighths or three-quarters foot burners, not more and not less, projecting sufficient light ahead to reveal any vehicle, person or substantial object upon the roadway within 200 feet.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25451.

Any motorcycle equipped with one lighted acetylene headlamp complies with the provisions of this code concerning lighted headlamps on motorcycles when the acetylene headlamp is fitted with a clear plane glass front and a bright six-inch spherical mirror and a standard acetylene one-half or five-eighths foot burner, projecting sufficient light ahead to reveal any vehicle, person, or substantial object upon the roadway within a distance of 115 feet.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25452.

No acetylene lamp shall emit any glaring light.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Reflectorizing Material [25500. - 25500.]

25500.

(a) Area reflectorizing material may be displayed on any vehicle, provided: the color red is not displayed on the front; designs do not tend to distort the length or width of the vehicle; and designs do not resemble official traffic control devices, except that alternate striping resembling a barricade pattern may be used.

No vehicle shall be equipped with area reflectorizing material contrary to these provisions.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to license plate stickers or tabs affixed to license plates as authorized by the
 Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Headlamps on Motorcycles and Motor-Driven Cycles [25650. - 25651.]

25650.

Every motorcycle during darkness shall be equipped with at least one and not more than two lighted headlamps which shall conform to the requirements and limitations of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25650.5.

Every motorcycle manufactured and first registered on and after January 1, 1978, shall be equipped with at least one and not more than two headlamps which automatically turn on when the engine of the motorcycle is started and which remain lighted as long as the engine is running. This section does not preclude equipping motorcycles used as authorized emergency vehicles with a switch to be used to turn off the headlamp during emergency situations or when the light would interfere with law enforcement, if the switch is removed prior to resale of the motorcycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25651.

The headlamp upon a motor-driven cycle may be of the single-beam or multiple-beam type, but in either event, when the vehicle is operated during darkness, the headlamp shall comply with the requirements and limitations as follows:

(a) The headlamp shall be of sufficient intensity to reveal a person or a vehicle at a distance of not less than 100 feet when the motor-driven cycle is operated at any speed less than 25 miles per hour and at a distance of not less than 200 feet when operated at a speed of 25 to not exceeding 35 miles per hour, and at a distance of 300 feet when operated at a speed greater than 35
 miles per hour.

(b) In the event the motor-driven cycle is equipped with a multiple-beam headlamp, the upper beam shall meet the minimum requirements set forth above and the lowermost beam shall meet the requirements applicable to a lowermost distribution of light as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 24407.

(c) In the event the motor-driven cycle is equipped with a single-beam lamp, it shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is loaded none of the high intensity portion of light, at a distance of 25 feet ahead, shall project higher than the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Vehicles Exempted [25800. - 25806.]

25800.

The provisions of Sections 24012, 24250, 24251, 24400 to 24404, inclusive, and Articles 3 (commencing with Section 24600), 4 (commencing with Section 24800), 5 (commencing with Section 24950), 6 (commencing with Section 25100), 9 (commencing with Section 25350), 11 (commencing with Section 25450), and 13 (commencing with Section 25650), shall not apply to special mobile equipment. Such equipment shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 24254, 25803, and 25950, and Article 12 (commencing with Section 25500) .

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

25801.

The provisions of Sections 24012, 24250, 24251, 24254, 24400 to 24404, inclusive, 24600 to 24604, inclusive, 24606 to 24610, inclusive, Section 25950, and Articles 4 (commencing with Section 24800), 5 (commencing with Section 24950), 6 (commencing with Section 25100), 9 (commencing with Section 25350), 11 (commencing with Section 25450), 12 (commencing with Section 25500), and 13 (commencing with Section 25650) and shall not apply to special construction or maintenance equipment, nor to motortrucks equipped with snow removal or sanding devices, but shall apply to motortrucks and automobiles used independently of such equipment.

The provisions of Section 25803 shall be applicable to such equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

25802.

Sections 24002, 24005, 24012, 24250, 24251, 24400 to 24404, inclusive, 24600 to 24604, inclusive, 24606 to 24610, inclusive, Article 4 (commencing with Section 24800), Article 5 (commencing with Section 24950), Article 6 (commencing with Section 25100), Article 9 (commencing with Section 25350), Article 11 (commencing with Section 25450), and Article 13 (commencing with Section 25650) of Chapter 2 of this division, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26301), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26700), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 27000) of this division, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 31301) of Division 13 do not apply to logging vehicles or any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code that is not designed, used, or maintained for the
 transportation of persons or property and that is operated or moved over a highway only incidentally; but any such vehicle shall be subject to Sections 2800, 2806, 24004, 25260, 25803, 25950, 25952, 26457, 27454, 27602, 31500, and 40150, and to Article 12 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 2 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 20.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25803.

(a) All vehicles not otherwise required to be equipped with headlamps, rear lights, or reflectors by this chapter shall, if operated on a highway during darkness, be equipped with a lamp exhibiting a red light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear of the vehicle. In addition, all of these vehicles operated alone or as the first vehicle in a combination of vehicles, shall be equipped with at least one lighted lamp exhibiting a white light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the front of the vehicle.

(b) A vehicle shall also be equipped with an amber reflector on the front near the left side and a red reflector on the rear near the left side. The reflectors shall be
 mounted on the vehicle not lower than 16 inches nor higher than 60 inches above the ground and so designed and maintained as to be visible during darkness from all distances within 500 feet from the vehicle when directly in front of a motor vehicle displaying lawful lighted headlamps undimmed.

(c) In addition, if a vehicle described in subdivision (a) or the load thereon has a total outside width in excess of 100 inches there shall be displayed during darkness at the left outer extremity at least one amber light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of 500 feet to the front, sides, and rear. At all other times there shall be displayed at the left outer extremity a solid red or fluorescent orange flag or cloth not less than 18 inches square.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 52.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25804.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, original lighting equipment installed on a vehicle manufactured prior to January 1, 1946, need not meet the requirements established by the department when the vehicle is used primarily for the purpose of historical exhibition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

25805.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a forklift truck which is towed upon the highway at the end of a combination of vehicles shall at all times be equipped with at least one stop lamp mounted upon the rear of the vehicle and shall be equipped with lamp-type turn signals. Such vehicle shall, during the hours of darkness, be equipped with at least one taillamp and one red reflector mounted upon the rear of the vehicle and shall be equipped with clearance lamps if the vehicle is 80 or more inches in width.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

25806.

Sections 24003 and 27002 shall not apply to the installation of warning lamps and sirens on ambulances or firetrucks which are used solely for demonstration purposes in the sales work of a licensed dealer, distributor, or vehicle manufacturer and shall not apply to ambulances or firetrucks being operated on a highway solely for the purpose of delivery from the licensee to a purchaser. Warning lamps shall be removed or covered with opaque material and the siren controls disabled whenever the vehicle is upon a highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Light Restrictions and Mounting [25950. - 25952.]

25950.

This section applies to the color of lamps and to any reflector exhibiting or reflecting perceptible light of 0.05 candela or more per foot-candle of incident illumination. Unless provided otherwise, the color of lamps and reflectors upon a vehicle shall be as follows:

(a) The emitted light from all lamps and the reflected light from all reflectors, visible from in front of a vehicle, shall be white or yellow, except as follows:

(1) Rear side marker lamps required by Section 25100 may show red to the front.

(2) The color of foglamps described in Section 24403 may be in the color spectrum from white to yellow.

(3) An illuminating device, as permitted under Section 24255, shall emit radiation predominantly in the infrared region of the electromagnetic spectrum. Any incidental visible light projecting to the front of the vehicle shall be predominantly yellow to white. Any incidental visible light projecting to the rear of the vehicle shall be predominantly red. Any incidental visible light from an illuminating device, as permitted under Section 24255, shall not resemble any other required or permitted lighting device or official traffic control device.

(4) ADS marker lamps, as described in subdivision (i) of Section 38750, on an autonomous vehicle.

(b) The emitted light from all lamps and the reflected light from all
 reflectors, visible from the rear of a vehicle, shall be red except as follows:

(1) Stoplamps on vehicles manufactured before January 1, 1979, may show yellow to the rear.

(2) Turn signal lamps may show yellow to the rear.

(3) Front side marker lamps required by Section 25100 may show yellow to the rear.

(4) Backup lamps shall show white to the rear.

(5) The rearward facing portion of a front-mounted double-faced turn signal lamp may show amber to the rear while the headlamps or parking lamps are lighted, if the intensity of the light emitted is not greater than the parking lamps and the turn signal function is not impaired.

(6) A reflector meeting the requirements of, and installed in accordance with, Section 24611 shall be red or white, or both.

(7) ADS marker lamps, as described in subdivision (i) of Section 38750, on an autonomous vehicle.

(c) All lamps and reflectors visible from the front, sides, or rear of a vehicle, except headlamps, may have any unlighted color, provided the emitted light from all lamps or reflected light from all reflectors complies with the required color. Except for backup lamps, the entire effective projected luminous area of lamps visible from the rear or mounted on the sides near the rear of a vehicle shall be covered by an inner lens of the required color when the unlighted color differs from the required emitted light color. Taillamps, stoplamps,
 and turn signal lamps that are visible to the rear may be white when unlighted on vehicles manufactured before January 1, 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   (SB 480)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25951.

Any lighted lamp or device upon a motor vehicle other than headlamps, spotlamps, signal lamps, or auxiliary driving lamps, warning lamps which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than 300 candlepower shall be so directed that no part of the beam will strike the level of the roadway at a distance of more than 75 feet from the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1313.)
-------------------------------------------

25952.

(a) Lamps, reflectors, and area reflectorizing material of a type required or permitted on a vehicle may be mounted on a load carried by the vehicle in lieu of, or in addition to, such equipment on the vehicle. Such equipment shall be mounted on the load in a manner that would comply with the requirements of this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code if the load were an integral part of the vehicle.

(b) Lamps on vehicles carried as a load shall not be lighted unless such lamps are mounted in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Equipment Testing [26100. - 26106.]

26100.

(a) A person shall not sell or offer for sale for use upon or as part of the equipment of a vehicle any lighting equipment, safety glazing material, or other device that does not meet the provisions of Section 26104.

(b) A person shall not use upon a vehicle, and a person shall not drive a vehicle upon a highway that is equipped with, any
 lighting equipment, safety glazing material, or other device that is not in compliance with Section 26104.

(c) This section does not apply to a taillamp or stop lamp in use on or prior to December 1, 1935.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 44.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

26101.

(a) A person shall not sell or offer for sale for use upon or as part of the equipment of a vehicle any device that is intended to modify the original design or performance of any lighting equipment, safety glazing material, or other device, unless the modifying device meets the provisions of Section 26104.

(b) A person shall not use upon
 a vehicle, and a person shall not drive a vehicle upon a highway that has installed a device that is intended to modify the original design or performance of a lighting, safety glazing material, or other device, unless the modifying device complies with Section 26104.

(c) This section does not apply to a taillamp or stop lamp in use on or prior to December 1, 1935, or to lamps installed on authorized emergency vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 45.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

26102.

In the event any equipment in actual use meets the requirements of this code or a department regulation adopted pursuant to this code, a subsequent regulation shall not require the replacement of the equipment and shall be applicable only to equipment installed after the effective date of the regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

26103.

(a) The department may adopt and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for safety belts, safety glazing material, safety helmets, sirens, tire traction devices, bunk stakes, and synthetic binders. The standards and specifications may include installation and aiming requirements.

(b) Notwithstanding rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall adopt regulations for lighting devices permitted
 by this code and incorporate by reference the applicable standards published by SAE International for these devices and a corresponding publication date. Notwithstanding the specified publication date, a person may sell or use upon a vehicle a device meeting the requirements of a revised standard.

(c) A federal motor vehicle safety standard adopted pursuant to Chapter 301 (commencing with Section 30101) of Part A of Subtitle VI of Title 49 of the United States Code that covers the same aspect of performance of a device shall prevail over provisions of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code. Lamps, devices, and equipment certified
 by the manufacturer to meet applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards as original equipment on new vehicles and the identical replacements for those items need not be certified to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26104.

(a) Every manufacturer who sells, offers for sale, or manufactures for use upon a vehicle devices subject to requirements established by the department shall, before the device is offered for sale, have laboratory test data showing compliance with such requirements. Tests may be conducted by the manufacturer.

(b) The department may at any time request from the manufacturer a copy of the test data showing proof of compliance of any device with the requirements established by the department and additional evidence that due care was exercised
 in maintaining compliance during production. If the manufacturer fails to provide such proof of compliance within 30 days of notice from the department, the department may prohibit the sale of the device in this state until acceptable proof of compliance is received by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 399, Sec. 8.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

26105.

The department may purchase any equipment sold for use on vehicles and test or retest the same as to conformance with the requirements of this code and department regulations adopted pursuant to this code and any expense incurred in such purchase and test shall be a legal charge against the Motor Vehicle Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

26106.

The department may issue a permit for the use of equipment for experimental purposes. The use of such equipment under the permit is not a violation of this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Brakes [26301. - 26522.]



  ARTICLE 1. Brake Requirements [26301. - 26311.]

26301.
